Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.130

Annual report.

The director of agriculture shall make an annual report to the governor containing an account of all matters pertaining to his or her department and its administration.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5107; 1977 c 75 s 51; 1965 c 8 s 43.23.130. Prior: (i) 1919 c 126 s 1, part; 1913 c 60 s 6, part; RRS s 2724, part. (ii) 1921 c 7 s 89, part; RRS s 10847, part.]